Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 5. Obstruction of Public Administration.

Collateral references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d, Arrest, § 106

32 Am. Jur. 2d, False Personation, § 1 et seq.

58 Am. Jur. 2d, Obstructing Justice, § 1 et seq.

6A C.J.S., Arrest, §§ 47 to 49.

35 C.J.S., False Personation, § 1 et seq.

67 C.J.S., Obstructing Justice, §§ 1-29.

Sec. 11.56.700.
Resisting or interfering with arrest.

A person commits the crime of resisting or interfering with arrest if, knowing that a peace officer is making an arrest, with the intent of preventing the officer from making the arrest, the person resists personal arrest or interferes with the arrest of another by

force;

committing any degree of criminal mischief; or

any means that creates a substantial risk of physical injury to any person.

Resisting or interfering with arrest is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “peace officer,” “force,” “physical injury” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Criminal mischief in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Hindering prosecution in the first and second degree — AS 11.56. — 11.56.780

Justification: use of force in resisting or interfering with arrest — AS

11.81.400

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.210

TD: IV, 73-74.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.705.
Harming a police dog in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of harming a police dog in the first degree if the person intentionally kills or causes serious physical injury to a police dog, knowing the dog to be a police dog.

Harming a police dog in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For provisions relating to cruelty to animals, see AS

11.61.140

.

Sec. 11.56.710.
Harming a police dog in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of harming a police dog in the second degree if the person intentionally causes physical injury to or, without causing physical injury to, torments, kicks, strikes, stones, or tampers with a police dog, knowing the dog to be a police dog.

Harming a police dog in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For provisions relating to cruelty to animals, see AS

11.61.140

.

Sec. 11.56.715.
Defense to harming a police dog.

It is a defense to a prosecution under AS

11.56.705

or

11.56.710

that the conduct of the defendant

conformed to accepted veterinary practice; or

was in response to a direct attack on the defendant by a police dog not acting under the control of a peace officer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

Definition of “police dog,” “serious physical injury,” “physical injury,” “peace officer” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

Sec. 11.56.720.
Refusing to assist a peace officer or judicial officer.

A person commits the offense of refusing to assist a peace officer or judicial officer if, upon a request, command, or order by someone the person knows to be a peace officer or judicial officer, that person unreasonably fails to make a good faith effort to physically assist the officer in the exercise of official duties.

A person who, without expecting compensation, assists a person in accordance with this section is not liable for civil damages as a result of an act or omission in rendering that assistance. This subsection does not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of reckless, wilful, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

Refusing to assist a peace officer or judicial officer is a violation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “peace officer,” “violation,” “offense” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “judicial officer” — AS

11.56.900

(2)

Violation procedures — AS

12.25.180

Authorized fine for violation — AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

Sentences for violations — AS

12.55.140

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.200.

TD: IV, 74-77.

Sec. 11.56.730.
Failure to appear.

A person commits the crime of failure to appear if the person

is released under the provisions of AS 12.30;

knows that the person is required to appear before a court or judicial officer at the time and place of a scheduled hearing; and

with criminal negligence does not appear before the court or judicial officer at the time and place of the scheduled hearing.

In a prosecution for failure to appear under (a) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that unforeseeable circumstances, outside the person’s control, prevented the person from appearing before the court or judicial officer at the time and place of the scheduled hearing, and the person contacted the court orally and in writing immediately upon being able to make the contact.

A person who commits failure to appear incurs a forfeiture of any security for any appearance of the person that was given or pledged to the court for the person’s release.

Failure to appear is a

class C felony if the person was released in connection with a charge of a felony or while awaiting sentence or appeal after conviction of a felony;

class A misdemeanor if the person was released in connection with a

charge of a misdemeanor, while awaiting sentence or appeal after conviction of a misdemeanor; or

requirement to appear as a material witness in a criminal proceeding.

In a prosecution for failure to appear under (a) of this section, it is not a defense that the defendant did not receive a reminder notification from a court or judicial officer under Rule 38(e), Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

(§ 2 ch 19 SLA 2010; am §§ 26 — 28 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 36, 37 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see
AS

12.55.125(e)

and (i)
for imprisonment for class B and C felonies,
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see secs. 185(a)(20) and (21), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), substituted “offense” for “crime”; in (c), deleted “, and is guilty of a” in the introductory language, deleted (c)(1) and (2), which read, “(1) class C felony if the person was released in connection with a charge of a felony, or while awaiting sentence or appeal after conviction of a felony; (2) class A misdemeanor if the person was released in connection with a (A) charge of a misdemeanor, or while awaiting sentence or appeal after conviction of a misdemeanor; or (B) requirement to appear as a material witness in a criminal proceeding.”; added (d). Effective January 1, 2019, added (e).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “the crime” for “the offense” in the introductory paragraph of (a); rewrote (d), which read, “(d) Failure to appear is a

“(1) class C felony if the person was released in connection with a charge of a felony or while awaiting sentence or appeal after conviction of a felony and the person

“(A) does not make contact with the court or a judicial officer within 30 days after the person does not appear at the time and place of a scheduled hearing; or

“(B) does not appear at the time and place of a scheduled hearing to avoid prosecution;

“(2) class A misdemeanor if the person was released in connection with a charge of a misdemeanor, while awaiting sentence or appeal after conviction of a misdemeanor, or in connection with a requirement to appear as a material witness in a criminal proceeding, and the person

“(A) does not make contact with the court or a judicial officer within 30 days after the person does not appear at the time and place of a scheduled hearing; or

“(B) does not appear at the time and place of a scheduled hearing to avoid prosecution; or

“(3) violation punishable by a fine of up to $1,000.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 31(a), ch. 19, SLA 2010, provides that this section “applies to acts committed on or after July 1, 2010.”

Section 142(a), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (a) and (d) of this section apply “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 19, SLA 2010 (House Bill 324), relating to this section, see 2010 House Journal 1401 — 1404.

Sec. 11.56.740.
Violating a protective order.

A person commits the crime of violating a protective order if the person is subject to a protective order

issued, filed, or recognized under AS 18.66 and containing a provision listed in AS

18.66.100(c)(1)

— (7) and knowingly commits or attempts to commit an act with reckless disregard that the act violates or would violate a provision of the protective order;

issued or recognized under AS

18.65.850

,

18.65.855

,

18.65.860

, or

18.65.867

and knowingly commits or attempts to commit an act that violates or would violate a provision listed in AS

18.65.850(c)(1)

— (3); or

issued under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

and knowingly commits or attempts to commit an act with reckless disregard that the act violates or would violate a provision of the protective order.

Violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

In this section, “protective order” means an order issued, filed, or recognized under AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

, AS

18.65.850

—

18.65.870

, or AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1991; am §§ 5, 6, 71 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 87 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 2006; am §§ 3, 4 ch 71 SLA 2012; am §§ 4, 5 ch 13 SLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Former law — AS

11.61.120(a)(6)

Domestic violence injunctions — AS

25.35.010

, 25.35.020

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For provisions relating to the use of weapons during a violation of this section, see AS

11.61.200

.

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, “AS

13.26.450

—

13.26.460

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.207 — 13.26.209” in two places to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective September 17, 2017, in (a)(1), substituted “issued, filed, or recognized” for “issued or filed” at the beginning, in (a)(2), inserted “or recognized” following “issued” at the beginning, and inserted “, or 18.65.867” following “18.65.860”, and made a related change; in (c), substituted “issued, filed, or recognized” for “issued or filed” following “means an order”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 49, ch. 71, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendments to subsections (a) and (c) “apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2012.”

Sec. 11.56.745.
Interfering with a report of a crime involving domestic violence.

A person, other than the victim, commits the crime of interfering with a report of a crime involving domestic violence if the person knowingly interferes with another person who is reporting or attempting to report a crime involving domestic violence to a law enforcement agency.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 86 SLA 1998.]

Violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 8 ch 63 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 86 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(c), ch. 63, SLA 1997 provides that this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1997.”

Sec. 11.56.750.
Unlawful contact in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of unlawful contact in the first degree if the person

has been ordered

by the court not to contact a victim or witness of the offense

as part of a sentence imposed under AS

12.55.015

;

as a condition of release under AS 12.30 or probation under AS

12.55.101

; or

while under official detention; or

as a condition of parole not to contact a victim or witness of the offense under AS

33.16.150

; and

either directly or indirectly, knowingly contacts or attempts to contact the victim or witness in violation of the order.

Unlawful contact in the first degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 43 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2013.

Sec. 11.56.755.
Unlawful contact in the second degree.

A person commits the crime or offense, as applicable, of unlawful contact in the second degree if

the person is arrested for a crime against a person under AS 11.41 or a crime involving domestic violence; and

before the person’s initial appearance before a judge or magistrate or before dismissal of the charge for which the person was arrested, whichever occurs first, the person initiates communication or attempts to initiate communication with the alleged victim of the crime that was the basis for the person’s arrest.

Unlawful contact in the second degree is

a class B misdemeanor if the person was arrested for an offense that is a class A misdemeanor or a felony offense;

a violation if the person was arrested for an offense that is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 86 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.756.
Definitions.

In AS

11.56.750

and

11.56.755

,

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

; and

“witness” has the meaning given in AS

12.61.900

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 86 SLA 1998)

Sec. 11.56.757.
Violation of condition of release.

A person commits the crime of violation of condition of release if the person

has been charged with a crime or convicted of a crime;

has been released under AS 12.30; and

violates a condition of release imposed by a judicial officer under AS 12.30, other than the requirement to appear as ordered by a judicial officer.

Violation of condition of release is a

class A misdemeanor if the person is released from a charge or conviction of a felony;

class B misdemeanor if the person is released from a charge or conviction of a misdemeanor.

In this section, “conviction” means that an adult, or a juvenile charged as an adult under AS 47.12, has entered a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere, or has been found guilty or guilty but mentally ill by a court or jury.

History.

(§ 3 ch 124 SLA 2000; am §§ 29, 30 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 19, 20 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 38 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(a)(22), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For punishment, see
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors,
AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to this section, see sec. 75(a)(16) and (17), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “offense” for “crime”; in (b), added “a violation punishable by a fine of up to $1,000” following “release is”; deleted (b)(1) and (2).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “crime” for “offense”; in (b), substituted “class B misdemeanor” for “violation punishable by a fine of up to $1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (b), which read, “Violation of condition of release is a class B misdemeanor.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.56.758.
Violation of custodian’s duty.

A person commits the crime of violation of custodian’s duty if the person knowingly fails, when acting as a custodian appointed by the court for a released person under AS 12.30, to report immediately as directed by the court that the person released has violated a condition of release.

Violation of custodian’s duty is

a class A misdemeanor if the released person is charged with a felony;

a class B misdemeanor if the released person is charged with a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 16 ch 124 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors,
and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(c), ch. 124, SLA 2004, provides that this section applies “to custodians who fail to report on or after July 1, 2004, for persons released for offenses committed on or after July 1, 2004.”

Sec. 11.56.759.
Violation by sex offender of condition of probation.

A person commits the crime of violation by sex offender of condition of probation if the person

is on probation for conviction of a sex offense;

has served the entire term of incarceration imposed for conviction of the sex offense; and

violates a condition of probation imposed under AS

12.55.100(a)(2)(E)

, (a)(2)(F), or (e),

12.55.101(a)(1)

, or any other condition imposed by the court that the court finds to be specifically related to the defendant’s offense.

In this section, “sex offense” has the meaning given in AS

12.63.100

.

Violation by sex offender of condition of probation is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 24 SLA 2007; am §§ 1, 2 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 31 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a)(3), substituted “AS

12.55.100(a)(2)(E)

, (a)(2)(F)” for “AS 12.55.100(a)(5), (a)(6)”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendments to (a) and (c) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), amending (a) and (c) of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Notes to Decision

Special probation requirement. —

Superior court properly imposed defendants' remaining jail time and refused to honor their rejection of further probation because, even though the original statute was repealed, its special probation requirement remained in force for the purpose of sustaining any prosecution for the enforcement of the penalty or liability, defendants could not reject the special term of probation, and had to serve out their statutorily mandated periods of probation, even though they had no further term of imprisonment remaining from their original sentences where another statute made it a separate crime for sex offenders to violate the conditions of their probation in such a situation. 2018 Alas. App. LEXIS 21.

Sec. 11.56.760.
Violating an order to submit to DNA testing.

A person commits the crime of violating an order to submit to DNA testing if, when requested by a health care professional acting on behalf of the state to provide a blood sample, oral sample, or both, or when requested by a juvenile or adult correctional, probation, or parole officer or a peace officer to provide an oral sample, the person refuses to provide the sample or samples and the person

has been ordered to submit to DNA testing as part of a sentence imposed under AS

12.55.015

;

has been convicted of an offense that requires DNA testing under the provisions of AS

44.41.035

; or

is required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63.

In this section, “DNA testing” means the collection of a blood sample, oral sample, or both, for the deoxyribonucleic acid identification registration system under AS

44.41.035

.

Violating an order to submit to DNA testing is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 95 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 88 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.762.
Unlawful use of DNA samples.

A person commits the crime of unlawful use of DNA samples if the person knowingly, without authorization under AS

44.41.035

, possesses or allows another person access to

a blood, oral, or tissue sample collected for inclusion in the deoxyribonucleic acid identification registration system under AS

44.41.035

; or

identification data or records derived from those samples.

Unlawful use of DNA samples is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 88 SLA 2003; am § 8 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.765.
Failure to report a violent crime committed against a child.

A person, other than the victim, commits the crime of failure to report a violent crime committed against a child if the person

witnesses what the person knows or reasonably should know is

the murder or attempted murder of a child by another;

the kidnapping or attempted kidnapping of a child by another;

the sexual penetration or attempted sexual penetration by another

of a child without consent of the child;

of a child that is mentally incapable;

of a child that is incapacitated; or

of a child that is unaware that a sexual act is being committed; or

the assault of a child by another causing serious physical injury to the child;

knows or reasonably should know that the child is under 16 years of age; and

does not in a timely manner report that crime to a peace officer or law enforcement agency.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant

did not report in a timely manner because the defendant reasonably believed that doing so would have exposed the defendant or others to a substantial risk of physical injury; or

acted to stop the commission of the crime and stopped

the commission of the crime; or

the completion of the crime being attempted.

In this section,

“incapacitated” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.470

;

“mentally incapable” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.470

;

“sexual act” has the meaning given in AS 11.41.470;

“without consent” has the meaning given in AS 11.41.470.

Failure to report a violent crime committed against a child is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.767.
Failure to report a violent crime committed against an adult.

A person, other than the victim, commits the offense of failure to report a violent crime committed against an adult if the person, under circumstances not requiring the person to report as required by AS

11.56.765

,

witnesses what the person knows or reasonably should know is

the murder or attempted murder of a person by another;

the kidnapping or attempted kidnapping of a person by another; or

the sexual penetration or attempted sexual penetration by another

of a person without consent of the person;

of a person who is mentally incapable;

of a person who is incapacitated; or

of a person who is unaware that a sexual act is being committed; and

does not, as soon as reasonably practicable, report that crime to a peace officer or law enforcement agency.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant

did not report as soon as reasonably practicable because the defendant reasonably believed that

doing so would have exposed the defendant or others to a substantial risk of physical injury; or

effective assistance was already being provided by another person; or

acted to stop the commission of the crime and stopped

the commission of the crime; or

the completion of the crime being attempted.

In this section,

“incapacitated” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.470

;

“mentally incapable” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.470

;

“sexual act” has the meaning given in AS 11.41.470;

“without consent” has the meaning given in AS 11.41.470.

Failure to report a violent crime committed against an adult is a violation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 16 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For punishment of violations, see AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 36(b), ch. 24, SLA 2007, provides that this section applies “to acts committed on or after July 1, 2007.”

Sec. 11.56.770.
Hindering prosecution in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of hindering prosecution in the first degree if the person renders assistance to a person who has committed a crime punishable as a felony with intent to

hinder the apprehension, prosecution, conviction, or punishment of that person; or

assist that person in profiting or benefiting from the commission of the crime.

For purposes of this section, a person “renders assistance” to another if the person

harbors or conceals the other person;

warns the other person of impending discovery or apprehension;

provides or aids in providing the other person with money, transportation, a dangerous instrument, a disguise, or other means of avoiding discovery or apprehension;

prevents or obstructs, by means of force, threat, or deception, anyone from performing an act which might aid in the discovery or apprehension of the other person;

suppresses by an act of concealment, alteration, or destruction physical evidence which might aid in the discovery or apprehension of the other person; or

aids the other person in securing or protecting the proceeds of the crime.

Hindering prosecution in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where an operator of a motor vehicle which was involved in an accident fails to render assistance to an injured person, an act which is punishable as a felony under
AS

28.35.060(c)

, Alaska state troopers investigate the incident and during the course of the investigation an attorney contacts the troopers, stating that a client has informed him that the client has committed the act and wishes to make restitution to the victim for medical expenses, and requests the troopers’ assistance in making the payment, but refuses to disclose to the troopers the name of his client, such refusal to divulge the client’s identity is neither illegal nor unethical. November 27, 1979, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.56.780.
Hindering prosecution in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of hindering prosecution in the second degree if the person renders assistance to another who has committed a crime punishable as a misdemeanor, with intent to

hinder the apprehension, prosecution, conviction, or punishment of the other person; or

assist the other person in profiting or benefiting from the commission of the crime.

For purposes of this section, a person “renders assistance” to another if the person does any act described in AS

11.56.770(b)

.

Hindering prosecution in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

Definition of “dangerous instrument,” “force,” “threat,” “deception” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Legal accountability for conduct of another — AS

11.16.110

Resisting or interfering with arrest — AS

11.56.700

Compounding — AS

11.56.790

Making a false report — AS

11.56.800

Original Code Provision — AS 12.15.020; AS 11.10.050

TD: IV, 81-82.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where an operator of a motor vehicle which was involved in an accident, fails to render assistance to an injured person, an act which is punishable as a felony under AS

28.35.060(c)

, Alaska state troopers investigate the incident and during the course of the investigation an attorney contacts the troopers, stating that a client has informed him that the client has committed the act and wishes to make restitution to the victim for medical expenses and requests the troopers’ assistance in making the payment, but refuses to disclose to the troopers the name of his client, such refusal to divulge the client’s identity is neither illegal nor unethical. November 27, 1979, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.56.790.
Compounding.

A person commits the crime of compounding if, unless authorized by AS

12.45.120

or

12.45.130

, the person

confers, offers to confer, or agrees to confer a benefit on another in consideration of that other person’s concealing an offense, refraining from initiating or aiding in the prosecution of an offense, or withholding evidence of an offense; or

accepts or agrees to accept a benefit in consideration of concealing an offense, refraining from initiating or aiding in the prosecution of an offense, or withholding evidence of an offense.

Compounding is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “benefit” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Authority to compromise misdemeanors for which victim has civil action — AS

12.45.120

Acknowledgement of satisfaction by injured party — AS

12.45.130

Bribery — AS

11.56.100

Receiving a bribe — AS

11.56.110

Offenses relating to judicial and other proceedings — AS 11.56.5 —

11.56.620

Hindering prosecution in the first and second degree — AS 11.56. 11.56.780

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.190.

TD: IV, 81-82.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.800.
False information or report.

A person commits the crime of false information or report if the person knowingly

gives false information to a peace officer

with the intent of implicating another in an offense; or

concerning the person’s identity while the person is

under arrest, detention, or investigation for a crime; or

being served with an arrest warrant or being issued a citation;

makes a false report to a peace officer that a crime has occurred or is about to occur;

makes a false report or gives a false alarm, under circumstances not amounting to terroristic threatening in the second degree under AS

11.56.810

, that a fire or other incident dangerous to life or property calling for an emergency response has occurred or is about to occur;

makes a false report to the Department of Natural Resources under AS 46.17 concerning the condition of a dam or reservoir; or

gives false information to a public employee relating to a person’s eligibility for a permanent fund dividend under AS 43.23 and the false information does not also violate AS

11.56.205

.

False information or report is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 65 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 10 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For crime of unsworn falsification, see AS

11.56.210

. For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.805.
False accusation.

A person commits the crime of false accusation if the person knowingly or intentionally initiates a false complaint with the Select Committee on Legislative Ethics established in AS 24.60.

False accusation is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.807.
Terroristic threatening in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of terroristic threatening in the first degree if the person knowingly sends or delivers a bacteriological, biological, chemical, or radiological substance or an imitation bacteriological, biological, chemical, or radiological substance and, as a result,

places a person in reasonable fear of physical injury to any person;

causes evacuation of a building, public place or area, business premises, or mode of public transportation; or

causes serious public inconvenience.

In this section,

“bacteriological, biological, chemical, or radiological substance” means a material that is capable of causing serious physical injury;

“imitation bacteriological, biological, chemical, or radiological substance” means a material that by its appearance would lead a reasonable person to believe that it is capable of causing serious physical injury.

Terroristic threatening in the first degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 17 ch 92 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 21, ch. 92, SLA 2002 provides that this section “applies to offenses committed on or after June 28, 2002.”

Sec. 11.56.810.
Terroristic threatening in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of terroristic threatening in the second degree if the person makes a threat that a circumstance

dangerous to human life or property exists or is about to exist with reckless disregard that the threat may

place a person in reasonable fear of serious physical injury to any person by means of a dangerous instrument;

cause evacuation of or initiation of an emergency protocol for a building, public place or area, business premises, or mode of public transportation;

cause serious public inconvenience; or

cause the public or a substantial group of people to fear serious physical injury; or

exists or is about to exist that is dangerous to the proper or safe functioning of an oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility, utility, or transportation or cargo facility; in this paragraph, “oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility” and “utility” have the meanings given in AS

11.46.495

.

Terrorist threatening in the second degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 40 SLA 1993; am § 18 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 9 SLA 2013; am § 39 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “peace officer,” “physical injury,” “building,” “intentionally,” “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900

Supervision of safety dams and reservoirs — AS 46.17

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.215; AS 11.45.050; AS 11.45.055.

TD: IV, 82-85.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor's notes. —

In 2003, in (a)(2) of this section, “AS

11.46.495

” was substituted for “AS

11.46.490

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of AS

11.46.490

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (a), which read, “A person commits the crime of terroristic threatening in the second degree if the person knowingly makes a false report that a circumstance

“(1) dangerous to human life exists or is about to exist and

“(A) a person is placed in reasonable fear of physical injury to any person;

“(B) causes evacuation of a building, public place or area, business premises, or mode of public transportation;

“(C) causes serious public inconvenience; or

“(D) the report claims that a bacteriological, biological, chemical, or radiological substance that is capable of causing serious physical injury has been sent or is present in a building, public place or area, business premises, or mode of public transportation; or

“(2) exists or is about to exist that is dangerous to the proper or safe functioning of an oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility, utility, or transportation or cargo facility; in this paragraph, ‘oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility’ and ‘utility’ have the meanings given in AS

11.46.495

.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.56.815.
Tampering with public records in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of tampering with public records in the first degree if the person violates

AS

11.56.820(a)(3)

with intent to obtain a benefit for that person or any person or to injure or deprive another person of a benefit; or

AS

11.56.820(a)(1)

or (2) with the intent to conceal a fact material to an investigation or the provision of services under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, AS 47.20, or AS 47.24.

Tampering with public records in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.820.
Tampering with public records in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of tampering with public records in the second degree if the person

knowingly makes a false entry in or falsely alters a public record;

knowingly destroys, mutilates, suppresses, conceals, removes, or otherwise impairs the verity, legibility, or availability of a public record, knowing that the person lacks the authority to do so; or

certifies a public record setting out a claim against a government agency, or the property of a government agency, with reckless disregard of whether the claim is lawful, or that payment of the claim is not authorized in the budget of the government agency.

In this section,

“certifies” means attesting to the existence, truth, or accuracy of facts, or that one holds an opinion, stated in a public record; the term includes the responsibilities for state officials set out in AS

37.10.030

;

“falsely alters” has the meaning ascribed to it in AS

11.46.580

; and

“makes a false entry” means to change or create a public record, whether complete or incomplete, by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter, or by any other means, so that the record so changed or created states or implies a fact that the maker knows is not true, or states or implies an opinion that the maker does not hold.

Tampering with public records in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public record” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of falsely alters — AS

11.46.580

Forgery in the first, second and third degree — AS

11.46.500

—

11.46.510

Offering a false instrument for recording — AS

11.46.550

Falsifying business records — AS

11.46.630

Perjury — AS

11.56.200

Tampering with physical evidence — AS

11.56.610

Official misconduct — AS

11.56.850

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.240; AS 11.30.245; AS 11.30.250; AS 11.30.260; AS 11.30.280.

TD: IV, 85-87.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When an official of a land title company seeking to file a warranty deed in Alaska, in the presence of the recorder altered a California notary clause to change the name and title of the person that the California notary public swore had appeared before her, the alteration may well have violated this section.
December 22, 1987, Op. Att’y Gen.